Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Trustees.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 25, ch. 105, SLA 1998 provides that AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

apply “only to

“(1) testamentary trusts created by wills, or codicils, of persons dying on or after September 15, 1998 regardless of when the trusts and codicils are executed;

“(2) nontestamentary trusts created on or after September 15, 1998; and

“(3) testamentary or nontestamentary trusts that are registered or reregistered after September 15, 1998 if the registrations state that the trusts will be governed by this Act.”

Sec. 13.36.070.
General duty not limited.

Except as specifically provided, the general duty of the trustee to administer a trust expeditiously for the benefit of the beneficiaries is not altered by AS 13.06 — AS 13.36.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.36.071.
Accepting or rejecting trusteeship.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) or (d) of this section, a person designated as a trustee accepts the trusteeship

by substantially complying with a method of acceptance provided by the terms of the trust; or

if the terms of the trust do not provide a method, or the method provided in the terms of the trust is not expressly made exclusive, and except as otherwise provided by the trust instrument, by accepting delivery of the trust property, exercising powers as a trustee, performing duties as a trustee, or otherwise indicating acceptance of the trusteeship.

A person designated as a trustee who has not yet accepted the trusteeship may reject the trusteeship. A person designated as a trustee who does not accept the trusteeship within a reasonable time after knowing of the designation is considered to have rejected the trusteeship.

A person designated as a trustee, without accepting the trusteeship, may act to preserve the trust property if, within a reasonable time after acting, the person sends a rejection of the trusteeship to the settlor or, if the settlor is dead or lacks capacity, to a qualified beneficiary.

A person designated as a trustee, without accepting the trusteeship, may inspect or investigate trust property to determine potential liability under environmental or other law or for another purpose.

History.

(§ 6 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.072.
Co-trustees.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument,

co-trustees who are unable to reach a unanimous decision may decide to act by majority decision;

if a vacancy occurs in a co-trusteeship, the remaining co-trustee or co-trustees may continue to act for the trust with full authority;

a co-trustee shall participate in the performance of the co-trustee’s function unless

the co-trustee is unavailable to perform the function because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or temporary incapacity; or

the co-trustee has properly delegated the performance of the function to another co-trustee;

if a co-trustee is unavailable to perform duties because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or temporary incapacity, and prompt action is necessary to achieve the purposes of the trust or to avoid injury to the trust property, the remaining co-trustee or a majority of the remaining co-trustees may act with full authority for the trust.

Except as prohibited by the terms of the trust, a co-trustee may, by a signed, written instrument, delegate to a co-trustee the performance of a function. Unless a delegation is irrevocable, a co-trustee may revoke a delegation.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, if the terms of a trust instrument provide for the appointment of more than one trustee but confer on one or more of the trustees, to the exclusion of other trustees, the power to direct or prevent specified actions of other trustees, the excluded trustees shall act in accordance with the exercise of the power. An excluded trustee under this subsection is not liable, individually or as a fiduciary, for a consequence that results from complying with the exercise of the power, regardless of the information available to the excluded trustee. An excluded trustee does not have an obligation to review, inquire, investigate, or make recommendations or evaluations with respect to the exercise of the power. A trustee having the power is liable to the beneficiaries as a fiduciary with respect to the exercise of the power as if the excluded trustees were not in office and has the exclusive obligation to account to and to defend an action brought by the beneficiaries with respect to the exercise of the power. In this subsection, “power” means the power to direct or prevent specified actions by other trustees.

History.

(§ 6 ch 7 SLA 2008; am § 8 ch 45 SLA 2013)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Section 48(b), ch. 45, SLA 2013, provides that (c) of this section applies “to a trust that exists before, on, or after September 9, 2013.”

Sec. 13.36.073.
Vacancy in trusteeship; appointment of successor.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, a vacancy in a trusteeship occurs if

a person designated as a trustee rejects the trusteeship or is considered to have rejected the trusteeship under AS

13.36.071

;

a person designated as a trustee cannot be identified or does not exist;

a trustee resigns;

a trustee is disqualified or removed under AS

13.36.076

;

a trustee dies;

a guardian or conservator is appointed for an individual serving as a trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, if one or more co-trustees remain in office, it is not necessary to fill a vacancy in a trusteeship, but a vacancy in a trusteeship shall be filled if the trust does not have a remaining trustee.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a noncharitable trust that is required to be filled shall be filled in the following order of priority:

under the terms of the trust;

by a person, other than a beneficiary, appointed by unanimous agreement of the qualified beneficiaries; or

by a person appointed by the court.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of an exclusively charitable trust that is required to be filled shall be filled in the following order of priority:

under the terms of the trust;

by a person selected by the unanimous consent of the charitable organizations expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of the trust; or

by a person appointed by the court.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, a qualified beneficiary who may be represented and bound by another person under AS

13.06.120

may have the qualified beneficiary’s consent to the appointment of a trustee as specified in this section given by the person who may represent the qualified beneficiary under AS

13.06.120

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.074.
Resignation of trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, a trustee may resign

not less than 30 days after providing written notice of the intent to resign to the qualified beneficiaries and all co-trustees; or

with the approval of the court.

In approving the resignation of a trustee, the court may issue orders and impose conditions on the resigning trustee that are reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, a liability of a resigning trustee for acts or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the trustee’s resignation.

History.

(§ 6 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.075.
Trustee’s standard of care and performance. [Repealed, § 4 ch 43 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 13.36.076.
Removal of trustee.

A trustee may be removed from office

by the decision of a trust protector under AS

13.36.370

(b)(1);

by the decision of another person specified in the trust instrument;

under a procedure specified in the trust instrument;

by a court on petition by the settlor, a co-trustee, a qualified beneficiary, or the court on its own initiative, if

the court finds there is a basis for removal under (b) of this section, there is not a trust protector or another specified person who is currently acting and who may be contacted by the settlor, trustee, or qualified beneficiary in person, by mail, electronically, or by another means, and there is not a procedure for removal specified in the trust instrument; or

notwithstanding the appointment of a trust protector under AS

13.36.370

or the existence of a procedure for trustee removal specified in the trust instrument, there has been a serious breach of trust as specified under (b)(1) of this section.

A trustee may be removed from office under (a)(4) of this section if the court finds that removal would be in the best interests of all the beneficiaries and,

for (a)(4)(A) or (B) of this section, the trustee has committed a serious breach of trust under the terms of the trust and AS

13.36.070

—

13.36.290

; or

for (a)(4)(A) of this section,

lack of cooperation among co-trustees substantially impairs the administration of the trust;

a trustee is unfit, is unwilling, or persistently fails to administer the trust effectively; or

there has been a substantial change of circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, removal is requested by all of the qualified beneficiaries, the court finds that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of all of the beneficiaries and is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust, and a suitable co-trustee or successor trustee is available.

When appointing a successor trustee, the court shall first consider the successor trustees named in the trust or, if the trust is a testamentary trust, in the testator’s will, or, if a successor is not named, another procedure contained in the instrument for the appointment of a successor. When selecting a successor trustee, the court shall also consider the tax, creditor liability, and similar consequences of selecting a certain individual or institution.

Pending a final decision on a petition to remove a trustee, or instead of or in addition to removing a trustee, the court may order relief that is appropriate and necessary to protect the trust property or the interest of the beneficiaries.

A qualified beneficiary who may be represented and bound by another person under AS

13.06.120

may have the qualified beneficiary’s consent to the removal of a trustee as specified in this section given by the person who may represent the qualified beneficiary under AS

13.06.120

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.077.
Delivery of property by former trustee.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument,

unless a co-trustee remains or the court otherwise orders, and until the trust property is delivered to a successor trustee or another person entitled to the trust property, a trustee who has resigned or been removed has the duties of a trustee and the powers necessary to protect the trust property;

a trustee who has resigned or been removed shall proceed expeditiously to deliver the trust property in the trustee’s possession to a co-trustee, a successor trustee, or another person entitled to the trust property.

History.

(§ 7 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.078.
Reimbursement of expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument,

a trustee is entitled to be reimbursed out of the trust property, with interest as appropriate, for

expenses that were properly incurred in the administration of the trust; and

expenses that were not properly incurred in the administration of the trust to the extent necessary to prevent unjust enrichment of the trust;

if the trustee advances money for the protection of the trust, the trustee has a lien against trust property to secure reimbursement of the money and payment of reasonable interest on the money.

History.

(§ 7 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.079.
Certification of trust; penalty.

Except as otherwise provided in the trust instrument, instead of furnishing a copy of the trust instrument to a person other than a beneficiary, the trustee may furnish to the person a certification of trust containing the following information:

that the trust exists and the date the trust instrument was executed;

the identity of the settlor;

the identity and address of the currently acting trustee;

the powers of the trustee;

the revocability or irrevocability of the trust and the identity of any person holding a power to revoke the trust;

the authority of co-trustees to sign or otherwise authenticate documents related to the trust and whether all or fewer than all co-trustees are required to exercise the trustee powers;

the trust’s taxpayer identification number, if the trust has a taxpayer identification number; and

the manner of taking title to the property of the trust.

A certification of trust may be signed or otherwise authenticated by any trustee.

A certification of trust must state that the trust has not been revoked, modified, or amended in a manner that would cause the representations contained in the certification of trust to be incorrect.

A certification of trust is not required to contain the dispositive terms of a trust.

A recipient of a certification of trust may require the trustee to furnish copies of the excerpts from the original trust instrument, including amendments to the trust that designate the trustee and confer on the trustee the power to act in the pending transaction for which the certification of trust is being furnished.

A person who acts in reasonable reliance on a certification of trust without knowledge that the representations contained in the certification of trust are incorrect is not liable to another person for acting in reasonable reliance on the certification of trust and may assume without inquiry the existence of the facts contained in the certification. Knowledge of the terms of the trust may not be inferred solely because the person relying on the certification is holding a copy of part of the trust instrument.

A person who in good faith enters into a transaction in reasonable reliance on a certification of trust may enforce the transaction against the trust property as if the representations contained in the certification were correct.

A person making a demand for the trust instrument in addition to a certification of trust or excerpts from the trust instrument is liable to the state for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000, plus the actual damages associated with the demand for the trust instrument, if a court determines that the person did not act in good faith in demanding the trust instrument.

A person who is found liable for a civil penalty under (h) of this section shall also be liable for actual court costs and attorney fees associated with a demand made under (h) of this section.

This section does not limit the right of a person to obtain a copy of the trust instrument in a judicial proceeding concerning the trust.

History.

(§ 7 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For effect of (i) of this section on Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure 54 and 82, see § 16, ch. 7, SLA 2008 in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.080.
Duty to inform and account to beneficiaries.

The trustee shall keep the beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed of the trust and its administration. In addition,

within 30 days after acceptance of the trust, the trustee shall inform in writing the current beneficiaries and, if possible, one or more persons who under AS

13.06.120

may represent beneficiaries with future interests, of the court in which the trust is registered and of the trustee’s name and address;

upon reasonable request, the trustee shall provide the beneficiary with a copy of the terms of the trust that describe or affect the beneficiary’s interest and with relevant information about the assets of the trust and the particulars relating to the administration;

upon reasonable request, a beneficiary is entitled to a statement of the accounts of the trust annually and on termination of the trust or change of the trustee.

The settlor of a trust may exempt a trustee from the duties under (a) of this section to provide notification or information regarding the trust to a beneficiary who is not entitled to a mandatory distribution of income or principal from the trust on an annual or more frequent basis. The settlor may provide the exemption by provision in the instrument creating the trust if the trust is created by a writing, by an amendment of the trust if the settlor reserved the power to amend the trust, or by a written document after the trust is created. The exemption may not exceed in duration the shorter of the settlor’s lifetime or a judicial determination of the settlor’s incapacity.

If a settlor provides for an exemption under (b) of this section and a beneficiary with a future interest

who is not a beneficiary entitled to a mandatory distribution of income or principal from the trust on an annual or more frequent basis receives a distribution, the trustee shall provide notification or information limited to the accounting period during which the distribution was made;

becomes a beneficiary entitled to a mandatory distribution of income or principal from the trust on an annual or more frequent basis, the trustee shall provide notification and information as required under AS 13.16 and (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 2000)

Sec. 13.36.085.
Bonding.

A trustee need not provide bond to secure performance of the trustee’s duties unless required by the terms of the trust, reasonably requested by a beneficiary, or found by the court to be necessary to protect the interests of the beneficiaries who are not able to protect themselves and whose interests otherwise are not adequately represented. On petition of the trustee or other interested person, the court may excuse a requirement of bond, reduce the amount of the bond, release the surety, or permit the substitution of another bond with the same or different sureties. If bond is required, it shall be filed in the court of registration or other appropriate court in amounts and with sureties and liabilities as provided in AS

13.16.260

and

13.16.270

relating to bonds of personal representatives.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.36.090.
Trustee’s duty; appropriate place of administration; deviation.

A trustee is under a continuing duty to administer the trust at a place appropriate to the purposes of the trust and to its sound, efficient management. If the principal place of administration becomes inappropriate for any reason, the court may enter any order furthering efficient administration and the interests of beneficiaries, including, if appropriate, release of registration, removal of the trustee under AS

13.36.076

, and appointment of a trustee in another state. Trust provisions relating to the place of administration and to changes in the place of administration or of trustee control unless compliance would be contrary to efficient administration or the purposes of the trust.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 7 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In the enrolled copy of SB 248 am H — ch. 78 SLA, 1972 — the words “shall be respected” were erroneously inserted in the third sentence of AS

13.36.090

after the word “control.” That sentence has been corrected here and is now identical to the official text of the Uniform Probate Code.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17, ch. 7, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 amendment of this section applies “to trusts in existence on and after March 28, 2008.”

Sec. 13.36.095.
Personal liability of trustee to third parties.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 105 SLA 1998.]

Subject to AS

13.36.105

—

13.36.220

, a trustee is personally liable for obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the trust estate or for torts committed in the course of administration of the trust estate only if personally at fault.

Claims based on contracts entered into by a trustee in a fiduciary capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of the trust estate, or on torts committed in the course of trust administration may be asserted against the trust estate by proceeding against the trustee in the trustee’s fiduciary capacity, whether or not the trustee is personally liable for them.

The question of liability as between the trust estate and the trustee individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting surcharge or indemnification or other appropriate proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am §§ 11, 22 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS

13.36.220

” in subsection (b) was substituted for “AS 13.36.295” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.

Sec. 13.36.100.
Limitations on proceedings against trustees.

Unless resolved or barred under (b) or (c) of this section, and notwithstanding the lack of adequate disclosure, all claims against a trustee who has issued a report received by the beneficiary and who has informed the beneficiary of the location and availability of records for examination by the beneficiary are barred unless a proceeding to assert the claims is commenced within three years after the beneficiary’s receipt of the report.

If a trustee petitions a court for an order approving a report that adequately discloses the existence of a potential claim, serves the report on all beneficiaries to be bound by the report, gives the beneficiaries at least 60 days’ notice of the court proceeding, and notifies the beneficiary that a claim must be begun within 45 days after the beneficiary is served with notice of the court proceeding, all potential claims of the beneficiaries against the trustee are barred unless the claims are served on the trustee and filed with the court within 45 days after the beneficiaries are served with notice of the court proceeding.

If a trustee serves a report on a beneficiary that adequately discloses the existence of a potential claim against the trustee, the trustee informs the beneficiary that a proceeding to assert any claim against the trustee must be commenced by the beneficiary within six months after receipt of the report, and the beneficiary fails to assert a claim against the trustee, all claims of the beneficiary are barred.

A beneficiary is considered to have received a report if, being an adult, the report is received by the beneficiary personally, or, if the beneficiary is a person who may be represented and bound by another person under AS

13.06.120

, the report is received by the person who may represent the person under AS

13.06.120

.

A report adequately discloses the existence of a potential claim against a trustee if it provides sufficient information for the beneficiary to know of the potential claim or to be expected to reasonably inquire into the existence of a claim with respect to the matter.

This section does not apply to claims brought by a beneficiary against a trustee for fraud committed by the trustee.

The report of a trustee under this section is considered to provide adequate notice to the beneficiary that there is a time limitation for filing a claim against the trustee if the cover page or top of the first page of the report contains the following language in at least 14 point bold type: “BY RECEIPT OF THIS REPORT, ANY ACTION YOU MAY HAVE AS A BENEFICIARY AGAINST THE TRUSTEE FOR BREACH OF TRUST BASED ON ANY MATTER ADEQUATELY DISCLOSED IN THIS REPORT MAY BE BARRED UNLESS THE ACTION IS BEGUN WITHIN SIX MONTHS AFTER YOU RECEIVE THIS REPORT. IF YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS, YOU MAY WISH TO OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE REGARDING THIS REPORT.”

In this section, “report” means a final report or an interim report for a certain period, and includes an accounting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 82 SLA 2004; am §§ 2 — 5, 15 ch 66 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (g) was enacted as (h) and relettered in 2006, at which time former subsection (g) was relettered as subsection (h).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 12(b), ch. 82, SLA 2004, provides that the amendment of this section by § 4, ch. 82, SLA 2004, “applies to a report received by a beneficiary on or after June 18, 2004.”

Sec. 13.36.105.
Powers attached to the office of trustee.

Unless otherwise provided by the trust instrument, an amendment of the trust instrument, or a court order, the powers of a trustee are attached to the office and are not personal.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.107.
General powers.

Without authorization by a court, a trustee may exercise the powers conferred by the terms of the trust and, except as limited by the terms of the trust, the powers conferred by this chapter.

This chapter does not affect the power of a court to

relieve a trustee from provisions contained in the terms of the trust that restrict the exercise of powers;

confer on a trustee additional powers, whether or not the powers are authorized by the terms of the trust; or

restrict the exercise of a power otherwise given to the trustee by the terms of the trust or this chapter.

The grant of a power to a trustee, whether under the terms of the trust, this chapter, or a court, does not alone govern the exercise of the power.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.109.
Specific powers of trustees.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, in addition to the powers conferred by the terms of the trust, a trustee may perform all actions necessary to accomplish the proper management, investment, and distribution of the trust property, including the power

to collect, hold, and retain trust property received from a settlor or another person; the property may be retained even if it includes property in which the trustee is personally interested;

to accept additions to the property of the trust from a settlor or another person;

to continue or to participate in the operation of a business or other enterprise that is part of the trust property and to effect an incorporation, dissolution, or other change in the form of the organization of the business or enterprise;

to acquire or dispose of property, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale or by exchange;

to manage, control, divide, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon trust property;

to encumber, mortgage, or pledge trust property for a term within or extending beyond the term of the trust in connection with the exercise of a power vested in the trustee;

to make ordinary or extraordinary repairs, alterations, or improvements in buildings or other trust property; to demolish improvements; and to raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings;

to subdivide or develop land; to dedicate land to public use; to make or obtain the vacation of plats and to adjust boundaries; to adjust differences in valuation on exchange or partition by giving or receiving consideration; and to dedicate easements to public use without consideration;

to enter into a lease for any purpose as lessor or lessee with or without the option to purchase or renew and for a term within or extending beyond the term of the trust;

to enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of gas, oil, or other minerals or geothermal energy; and to enter into a community oil lease, a pooling agreement, or a unitization agreement;

to grant an option involving disposition of trust property or to take an option for the acquisition of property, including an option that is exercisable beyond the duration of the trust;

with respect to shares of stock of a domestic or foreign corporation, a membership in a nonprofit corporation, or other property, to

vote in person and to give proxies to exercise any voting rights with respect to the shares, memberships, or property;

waive notice of a meeting or to give consent to the holding of a meeting; and

authorize, ratify, approve, or confirm an action that could be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners;

to pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable to or accruing against or on a securities account;

to sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights;

to consent, directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise; to participate in voting trusts, pooling arrangements, and foreclosures; and, in connection with a reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, liquidation, voting trust, pooling arrangement, or foreclosure, to deposit securities with, transfer title, and delegate discretion to a protective or other committee as the trustee considers advisable;

to deposit securities in a securities depository;

to insure the property of the trust against damage or loss and to insure the trustee against liability with respect to third persons;

to borrow money for a trust purpose to be repaid from trust property;

to pay or contest a claim, to settle a claim by or against the trust by compromise, arbitration, or otherwise, and to release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the trust;

to pay taxes, assessments, reasonable compensation of the trustee, employees, and agents of the trust, and other expenses incurred in the collection, care, administration, and protection of the trust;

to make loans out of trust property to an eligible beneficiary or an eligible third-party entity on terms and conditions the trustee considers to be fair and reasonable under the circumstances and to guarantee loans to the eligible beneficiary or eligible third-party entity by encumbrances on trust property; in this paragraph,

“eligible beneficiary” means a beneficiary of the trust who is currently eligible for or entitled to a distribution of income or principal of the trust;

“eligible third-party entity” means a third-party entity if more than 50 percent of the equity of the entity is owned by the trust or by one or more beneficiaries of the trust;

to pay an amount distributable to a beneficiary, whether or not the beneficiary is under a legal disability, by paying the amount to the beneficiary or by paying the amount to another person for the use or benefit of the beneficiary;

to make a distribution of property and money in divided or undivided interests, pro rata or otherwise, and to adjust resulting differences in valuation;

to employ accountants, attorneys, investment advisers, appraisers, or other persons, even if they are associated or affiliated with the trustee, to advise or assist the trustee in the performance of administrative duties;

to inspect or investigate property that the trustee has been asked to hold or property owned or operated by an entity in which the trustee holds or has been asked to hold an interest for the purpose of determining the application of environmental law to the property and to take action to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy an actual or potential violation of an environmental law affecting property held directly or indirectly by the trustee;

to establish for an asset a reserve for depreciation, depletion, or obsolescence, and to decide, under law, how and in what proportions a receipt or disbursement is to be credited, charged, or apportioned between principal and income;

to execute and deliver instruments that are useful to accomplish or facilitate the exercise of the trustee’s powers;

to prosecute or defend an action, claim, or proceeding in order to protect trust property and the trustee in the performance of the trustee’s duties; and

to consider discretionary distributions to a beneficiary as being made from capital gains realized during the year.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 66 SLA 2006; am § 11 ch 64 SLA 2010)

Sec. 13.36.110.
Liability of trustee relating to exercise of power.

A dissenting trustee who has joined another trustee in exercising a power is not liable to the beneficiaries or to others for the consequences of the exercise of the power if the dissenting trustee joins because of a requirement for unanimous trustee consent to the exercise of the power. The dissenting trustee’s dissent must be presented in writing to a co-trustee and a legally competent beneficiary or, if the beneficiary is a minor or an incompetent person, the representative of the beneficiary. A trustee who is not authorized to exercise a power is not liable to the beneficiaries or to others for

the exercise by a co-trustee of the power; or

the failure to exercise that power.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.120.
Voting of corporate stock owned by trustee.

A trustee of a trust owning corporate stock is liable for a loss resulting to the beneficiaries from a failure to use reasonable care in deciding how to vote the stock and in voting the stock only if personally at fault.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.125.
Creation of trust bank account to pay special debts.

Whenever a bank account is, by entries made on the books of the depositor and the bank at the time of the deposit, created exclusively for the purpose of paying dividends, interest, interest coupons, salaries, wages, or pensions or other employee benefits, and the depositor at the time of opening the account does not expressly declare otherwise, the depositor is considered a trustee of the account for the creditors to be paid from the account, subject to any power of revocation that the depositor may have reserved by agreement with the bank.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.130.
Failure of beneficiary to present claim for payment.

If a beneficiary for whom a trust bank account is created under AS

13.36.125

does not present the beneficiary’s claim to the bank for payment within one year after the claim is due, the depositor who created the trust may revoke the trust as to the beneficiary.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.135.
Holding stock in name of nominee.

A trustee of a trust owning stocks, bonds, notes, debentures, or other written obligations of a public or private corporation may hold the obligations in the name of a nominee, without mention of the trust in the records of the corporation or in the stock certificate or stock registration book of the corporation, if

the trust records and all reports or accounts rendered by the trustee clearly show the ownership of the stocks, bonds, notes, debentures, or other written obligations of the public or private corporation by the trustee and the facts regarding the holding by the trustee; and

the nominee deposits with the trustee a signed statement showing the trust ownership, endorses the stock certificate or other title instruments for the obligations in blank, and does not have possession of or access to the stock certificate or other title instruments for the obligations except under the immediate supervision of the trustee.

A trustee holding obligations under (a) of this section is personally liable for a loss to the trust resulting from an act of the nominee in connection with the stocks, bonds, notes, debentures, or other written obligations held under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.140.
Loan of trust funds.

Except as provided in AS

13.36.145

, a corporate trustee may not lend trust funds to itself or an affiliate, or to a director, an officer, or an employee of itself or an affiliate, and a noncorporate trustee may not lend trust funds to itself or to a relative, an employer, an employee, or a partner or other business associate.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)

Sec. 13.36.145.
Corporate trustee depositing trust funds with itself.

A corporate trustee that is subject to regulation and supervision by state or federal authorities may deposit with itself trust funds that are being held out of necessity pending investment, distribution, or payment of debts if the corporate trustee

pays into the trust for the deposit the interest the corporate trustee is required by state or federal law to pay on uninvested trust funds or, if there is not a state or federal law requiring the payment of interest, at the same rate of interest the corporate trustee pays on similar nontrust deposits; and

maintains in its trust department as security for the deposit a separate fund consisting of securities that are legal for trust investments and that are at all times equal in total market value to the amount of the deposit, except that the security is not required to the extent that the deposit is insured or given a preference by state or federal law.

The separate fund of securities required by (a)(2) of this section shall be marked as a separate fund for (a)(2) of this section. Withdrawals from or additions to the separate fund may be made from time to time, as long as the required value is maintained. The income of the securities in the separate fund belongs to the corporate trustee. In the statements of its financial condition published or delivered to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, the corporate trustee shall show as separate items the amount of trust funds that it has deposited with itself and the amount of securities that it holds as security for the payment of the deposits.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998; am § 18 ch 14 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 13.36.150.
Trustee leasing, buying, or selling to or from itself or a related person.

A trustee, unless expressly authorized by the trust instrument, may not directly or indirectly lease, buy, or sell property for the trust from or to

itself or an affiliate;

a director, an officer, or an employee of the trustee or an affiliate; or

a relative, an employer, or a partner or other business associate.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1998)